Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.315

Partner's power to bind partnership after dissolution.

Subject to RCW 25.05.320, a partnership is bound by a partner's act after dissolution that:

(1) Is appropriate for winding up the partnership business; or

(2) Would have bound the partnership under RCW 25.05.100 before dissolution, if the other party to the transaction did not have notice of the dissolution.

[ 1998 c 103 s 804.]